Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.465

Factory built housing and commercial structures, regulating installation of—Injunctive process, procedure.

The department may obtain from a superior court having jurisdiction, a temporary injunction enjoining the installation of factory built housing or factory built commercial structures on any building site upon affidavit of the department that such factory built housing or factory built commercial structures do not conform to the requirements of RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490 or to the rules adopted pursuant to RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490. The affidavit must set forth such violations in detail. The injunction may be made permanent, in the discretion of the court.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 22 s 3; 1970 ex.s. c 44 s 4.]